Louisiana, session 2026, HB866.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1867.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1867.1 Pharmacy benefit managers and managed care plans pharmacy
reimbursement restrictions and prohibitions
A. For purposes of this Section, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Acquisition cost (NADAC)" has the same meaning as provided in R.S.
22:1868.
(2) "Effective rate pricing" has the same meaning as provided in R.S.
22:1867.
(3) "Managed care plan" has the same meaning as provided in R.S. 22:1007.
(4) "Pass through pricing" means a transparent pharmacy benefit
management (PBM) contract model where the amount a PBM or managed care plan
pays a pharmacy for a drug is directly passed through to the health plan sponsor.
(5) "Pharmacy benefit manager (PBM)" has the same meaning as provided
in R.S. 22:1863.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-835 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 866
(6) "Reimbursement Formula" has the same meaning as provided in R.S. 22:
1868.
(7) "Spread Pricing" has the same meaning as provided in R.S. 22:1863.
(8) "Steering" has the same meaning as provided in R.S. 40:2870.
B. Pharmacy benefit managers and managed care plans that contract or
provide pharmacy benefit services shall not reimburse any pharmacy located in this
state for any of the following amounts:
(1) An amount less than the amount that is calculated using the
reimbursement formula which shall include this state's professional dispensing fee.
(2) An amount less than the amount that the PBM reimburses a PBM
affiliate, subsidiary, other related entities for dispensing the same prescription drug
as dispensed by the pharmacy.
(3) An amount less than the most recently published NADAC for a
prescription drug plus this state's professional dispensing fee on the date that the
prescription drug is administered or dispensed.
(4) An amount less than the NADAC plus this state's professional dispensing
fee or wholesale acquisition cost plus this state's professional dispensing fee if the
NADAC is unavailable on the date the prescription drug is administered or
dispensed.
C. A pharmacy benefit manager, in this state, may:
(1) Adopt a reimbursement formula using either NADAC as the prescription
drug pricing benchmark plus the state's professional dispensing fee or, with prior
written approval by the commissioner, an alternative prescription drug pricing
benchmark that results in claim payment errors that are both comparable to or less
than NADAC in terms of frequency and smaller than NADAC in terms of
magnitude; or
(2) Adopt a reimbursement formula using an adjustment factor that, based
on claims experience data available to the pharmacy benefit manager, is reasonably
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-835 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 866
expected to result in a claim payment error rate of no more than two percent per drug
as identified by its national drug code.
D. Pharmacy benefit managers and managed care plans that contract or
provide pharmacy benefit services, in this state, are prohibited from the following:
(1)(a) Spread Pricing
(b) A PBM or managed care plan may use direct or indirect spread pricing
only if the difference between the amount the third-party payor pays the PBM or
managed care plan for a prescription drug and the amount the PBM or managed care
plan reimburses the dispensing pharmacy or dispensing health care provider for the
prescription drug is passed through by the PBM or managed care plan to the person
contracted to receive third-party payor services.
(2) Steering
(3) Effective rate pricing
(4) Using any other method, other than the methods outlined in this Section,
to calculate reimbursement costs
E. PBMs and managed care plans that contract or provide pharmacy benefit
services, in this state, shall use pass-through pricing for every covered claim
submitted.
F. The failure of a pharmacy benefit manager to reimburse a pharmacy or
pharmacist or his agent for the fees authorized in this Section shall be an act for
which the pharmacy benefit manager or its agents may be sanctioned by the
commissioner; which shall include, but is not limited to, fines in the amount of one
hundred thousand dollars or more per violation within a calendar year.
Section 2. All contracts executed, amended, adjusted, or renewed on or after
July 1, 2026, that are applicable to prescription benefits on or after January 1, 2027,
between a pharmacy benefit manager (PBM) or a managed care plan and a payor, or
between a person and a payor, to use a pass-through pricing model with an exception
as detailed in the bill, and to ensure that payments received by a PBM or managed
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-835 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 866
care plans for providing services to a payor or a pharmacy are used or distributed
pursuant to the PBM’s or managed care plan's contract with the payor or with the
pharmacy, or as otherwise required by law.